Washington statutes.
RCW 26.09.410

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout RCW 26.09.405 through 26.09.560 and 26.09.260 unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Court order" means a temporary or permanent parenting plan, custody order, visitation order, or other order governing the residence of a child under this title.

(2) "Relocate" means a change in principal residence either permanently or for a protracted period of time, or a change in residence in cases where parents have substantially equal residential time as defined by RCW 26.09.525.

[ 2019 c 79 s 4; 2000 c 21 s 2.]

NOTES:

Intent—Captions not law—2000 c 21: See notes following RCW 26.09.405.